Illinois, session 104th, HB3661.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by adding Section 605-1118 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 605/605-1118 new)8    Sec. 605-1118. Quantum information science research and 9development.10    (a) In order to advance and increase quantum information 11science investment and research in the State of Illinois, and 12to make the State of Illinois a leader in the area of quantum 13information science, quantum computing, and other applications 14of quantum science in technology, there is hereby created the 15Quantum Information Science Research and Development Tax 16Credit Program. 17    (b) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 182026, the Department shall issue a tax credit certificate 19against the taxes imposed under subsections (a) and (b) of 20Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act in an amount equal 21to 13% of the qualifying quantum information science 22expenditures made by the taxpayer during the taxable year. 23    (c) Taxpayers seeking a credit certificate for qualifying   HB3661- 2 -LRB104 09167 HLH 19223 b1quantum information science expenditures shall apply to the 2Department in the form and manner specified by the Department. 3    (d) The total aggregate amount of the credits awarded 4under this Section shall not exceed $25,000,000 in any 5calendar year. 6    (e) The Department, in consultation with the Department of 7Revenue, shall adopt rules to implement and administer this 8Section. 9    (f) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 10250 of the Illinois Income Tax Act. 11    (g) As used in this Section: 12    "Qualifying quantum information science expenditures" 13means expenditures specifically related to advancing quantum 14information science research and development in the State of 15Illinois that would otherwise be qualifying expenditures as 16defined for the federal credit for increasing research 17activities that are allowable under Section 41 of the Internal 18Revenue Code and that are conducted in this State. 19    "Quantum information science" has the meaning given to 20that term in Section 2 of the federal National Quantum 21Initiative Act.  22    Section 10. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 23adding Section 246 as follows: 24    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)  HB3661- 3 -LRB104 09167 HLH 19223 b1    Sec. 246. Quantum information science research and 2development tax credit.3    (a) For tax years ending on or after December 31, 2026, a 4taxpayer who qualifies for a quantum information science 5research and development tax credit pursuant to Section 6605-1115 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, 8is entitled to a credit against the tax imposed by subsections 9(a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act as provided in that 10Section. 11    (b) For partners and shareholders of subchapter S 12corporations, the credit under this Section shall be 13determined in accordance with Section 251.14    (c) In no event shall a taxpayer be allowed both a credit 15under this Section for qualifying quantum information science 16expenditures and the research and development credit provided 17under subsection (k) of Section 201 for the same expenditures. 18    (d) Any credit awarded under this Section in excess of the 19taxpayer's tax liability for the taxable year may be carried 20forward. A taxpayer may elect to have the unused credit shown 21on its final completed return carried over as a credit against 22the tax liability for the following 5 taxable years or until 23the credit has been fully used, whichever occurs first. If a 24tax liability for the given year still remains, the credit 25from the next earliest year will then be applied, and so on, 26until all credits have been used or no tax liability for the   HB3661- 4 -LRB104 09167 HLH 19223 b1given year remains. Any remaining unused credit or credits 2then will be carried forward to the next following year in 3which a tax liability is incurred, except that no credit can be 4carried forward to a year which is more than 5 years after the 5year in which the expense for which the credit is given was 6incurred. 7    (e) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 8250 of this Act.  9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.